Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-308
Water; free or underpriced service to city or village officers; acceptance by officer; prohibited; penalties.

Any water company engaged in furnishing water in any city or village in this state and any person, corporation, partnership, or limited liability company engaged in such services who furnishes to any elected or appointed officer in such city or village, water free of charge or for a price less than is at the time charged for similar service to other customers in such city or village shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor. If any officer in any such city or village accepts free of charge or for a price less than is charged to other customers in such city or village any of the services mentioned in this section, such officer shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor and shall also forfeit the office held by him or her at the date of such violation. Each day such service or services are furnished or accepted in violation of this section shall constitute a separate and distinct offense and shall be punished accordingly.

Laws 1897, c. 13, § 6, p. 138;

R.S.1913, § 5221;

C.S.1922, § 4422;

C.S.1929, § 18-406;

R.S.1943, § 18-308;

Laws 1982, LB 347, § 5;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 139;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 8.